Wisconsin, session 2025, SB508.
do enact as follows:SB508,11Section 1. 121.52 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB508,2,42121.52 (6) A school board may directly or indirectly by entering into a contract 3with a 3rd party install and monitor photographic or video systems on school buses 4for the purpose of recording evidence of violations of s. 346.48 (1).SB508,21Section 2. 346.485 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 346.485 (2) (am) and 2346.485 (2) (am) (intro.) and 2., as renumbered, are amended to read:SB508,3,63346.485 (2) (am) (intro.) The operator of a school bus who observes a violation 4of s. 346.48 (1) may prepare a written report for delivery under sub. (3) indicating 5that a violation has occurred. If possible, the The report shall contain the following 6information:SB508,3,772. The license number and color of the vehicle involved in the violation.SB508,38Section 3. 346.485 (2) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB508,3,179346.485 (2) (bm) 1. If an owner or operator of a school bus or a 3rd-party 10vendor that monitors photographic or video systems installed on a school bus 11detects a violation of s. 346.48 (1) by use of a photographic or video system equipped 12to the school bus, the owner, operator, or 3rd-party vendor may prepare a report, 13photographic or video evidence, or, if authorized under subd. 2., a uniform traffic 14citation under s. 345.11 for delivery under sub. (3) indicating that a violation has 15occurred. A report or citation under this paragraph shall be accompanied by a 16photograph or recording that demonstrates the violation. A citation under this 17paragraph need not be complete before delivery under sub. (3).SB508,3,21182. A municipality may authorize by ordinance the completion and issuance of 19uniform traffic citations prepared by a 3rd party vendor under subd. 1. and delivery 20of the citation to a traffic officer in the county or municipality in which the violation 21occurred for review under sub. (3).SB508,422Section 4. 346.485 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB508,4,1123346.485 (3) Within 24 hours after observing the violation, the school bus 24operator may deliver the If a person under sub. (2) delivers a report or photographic 1or video evidence satisfying the requirements of sub. (2) (am) or (bm) to a traffic 2officer of the county or municipality in which the violation occurred, the traffic 3officer may issue a citation under sub. (4). If a person provides a citation and 4photograph or recording under sub. (2) (bm) to a traffic officer of the county or 5municipality in which the violation occurred, the traffic officer may review the 6citation and photograph or recording and complete and issue the citation. A report 7which under this subsection that does not contain satisfy all the information in 8requirements under sub. (2) (am) or (bm) or a citation under sub. (2) (bm) that a 9traffic officer has declined to issue shall nevertheless be delivered and shall be 10maintained by the county or municipality for statistical purposes, except that any 11photographic or video evidence may not be maintained.SB508,512Section 5. 346.485 (4) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB508,4,1613346.485 (4) A traffic officer who issues a uniform traffic citation for a 14violation under this section shall personally serve the citation upon the owner of the 15vehicle or serve the citation by 1st class mail addressed to the owner’s last known 16address.SB508,617Section 6. 346.49 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB508,4,2218346.49 (3) A vehicle owner or other person found liable under s. 346.485 or 19346.457 may be required to forfeit not less than $30 nor more than $300. Imposition 20of liability under s. 346.485 or 346.457 shall not result in suspension or revocation 21of a person’s operating license under s. 343.30, nor shall it result in demerit points 22being recorded on a person’s driving record under s. 343.32 (2) (a).SB508,723Section 7. 346.49 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:SB508,5,424346.49 (3m) A vehicle owner or other person found liable under s. 346.485 1may be required to forfeit not less than $30 nor more than $500. Imposition of 2liability under s. 346.485 shall not result in suspension or revocation of a person’s 3operating license under s. 343.30, nor shall it result in demerit points being 4recorded on a person’s driving record under s. 343.32 (2) (a).SB508,5,55